Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.210

Clerks of court.

There shall be a chief clerk of the municipal court appointed by the judges of the municipal court subject to such civil service laws and rules as may be provided in such city. After August 11, 1969, those employees connected with the court under civil service status shall be continued in such employment and such classification. Before the chief clerk enters upon the duties of the chief clerk's office, the chief clerk shall take and subscribe an oath the same as required for officers of the city, and shall execute a penal bond in such sum and with such sureties as the legislative body of the city may direct and subject to their approval, conditioned that the chief clerk will faithfully account to and pay over to the treasurer of said city all moneys coming into his or her hands as such clerk, and that he or she will faithfully perform the duties of his or her office to the best of his or her knowledge and ability. Upon the recommendation of the judges of the municipal court, the legislative body of the city may provide for the appointment of such assistant clerks of the municipal court as said legislative body deems necessary, with such compensation as said legislative body may deem reasonable and such assistant clerks shall be subject to such civil service as may be provided in such city: PROVIDED, That the judges of the municipal court shall appoint such clerks as the board of county commissioners may determine to handle cases involving violations of state law, wherein the court has concurrent jurisdiction with the district and superior court. All clerks of the court shall have power to administer oaths, swear and acknowledge signatures of those persons filing complaints with the court, take testimony in any action, suit or proceeding in the court relating to the city or county for which they are appointed, and may certify any records and documents of the court pertaining thereto. They shall give bond for the faithful performance of their duties as required by law.

[ 1987 c 202 s 197; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.210. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 21.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.